Nevada, session 83, AB240.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:

Section 1. Chapter 385B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3 and 4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 3. “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
Sec. 4. “Sex” means the biological sex of a natural person,
either male or female, as observed or clinically verified at birth.
Sec. 5. 1. A public school or a private school whose pupils
compete against a public school shall expressly designate each
interscholastic or intramural athletic team or sport that is
sponsored by the school as one of the following, based on sex:
(a) “Males,” “men” or “boys”;
(b) “Females,” “women” or “girls”; or
(c) “Coed” or “mixed.”
2. An athletic team or sport that is designated for:
(a) “Females,” “women” or “girls” pursuant to subsection 1
must not be open to pupils of the male sex.
(b) “Males,” “men” or “boys” pursuant to subsection 1 must
not be open to pupils of the female sex.
3. If pupils of the male and the female sex participate
together in an interscholastic or intramural athletic team or sport,
the team or sport must be designated as “coed” or “mixed.”
Sec. 6. 1. The designation of an interscholastic or
intramural athletic team or sport based on sex, the exclusion of a
member of the male sex from a team or sport designated for
females or the exclusion of a member of the female sex from a
team or sport designated for males pursuant to section 5 of this act
does not constitute discrimination on the basis of sex or gender
identity or expression for the purposes of any state statute or local
ordinance.
2. A governmental entity, a licensing or accrediting
organization or any athletic association or organization shall not
entertain a complaint, open an investigation or take any other
adverse action against a public school, a private school, a school
district or the Association for maintaining separate interscholastic
or intramural athletic teams or sports for pupils of the female sex
or the male sex.
-
*AB240*

– 6 –
Sec. 7. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of NRS 41.0305 to
41.039, inclusive, but subject to the limitation on damages set
forth in NRS 41.035, when applicable:
(a) A pupil who is deprived of an athletic opportunity or
suffers any direct or indirect harm as a result of a school
knowingly violating sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act may bring
an action against the school for injunctive relief, damages and any
other relief available under law.
(b) A pupil who is subject to retaliation or other adverse action
by a school or athletic association or organization as a result of
reporting a violation of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act to an
employee or representative of the school or athletic association or
organization or to any state or federal agency with oversight of
schools in this State may bring an action against the school or
athletic association or organization for injunctive relief, damages
and any other relief available under law.
(c) A school that suffers any direct or indirect harm as a result
of a violation of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act by a
governmental entity, licensing or accrediting organization or
athletic association or organization may bring an action for
injunctive relief, damages and any other relief available under
law.
2. A civil action brought pursuant to subsection 1 must be
initiated within 2 years after the harm occurred. A person or
organization who prevails on a claim brought pursuant to this
section is entitled to monetary damages, including, without
limitation, for any psychological, emotional and physical harm
suffered, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and any other
appropriate relief.
Sec. 8. Chapter 398 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 9. As used in sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, “sex” means the biological
sex of a natural person, either male or female, as observed or
clinically verified at birth.
Sec. 10. 1. A public institution or a private institution
whose teams compete against a public institution shall expressly
designate each interscholastic or intramural athletic team or sport
that is sponsored by the institution as one of the following, based
on sex:
(a) “Males,” “men” or “boys”;
(b) “Females,” “women” or “girls”; or
(c) “Coed” or “mixed.”
2. An athletic team or sport that is designated for:
-
*AB240*

– 7 –
(a) “Females,” “women” or “girls” pursuant to subsection 1
must not be open to students of the male sex.
(b) “Males,” “men” or “boys” pursuant to subsection 1 must
not be open to students of the female sex.
3. If students of the male and the female sex participate
together in any interscholastic or intramural athletic team or
sport, the team or sport must be designated as “coed” or “mixed.”
Sec. 11. 1. The designation of an interscholastic or
intramural athletic team or sport based on sex, the exclusion of a
member of the male sex from a team or sport designated for
females or the exclusion of a member of the female sex from a
team or sport designated for males pursuant to section 10 of this
act does not constitute discrimination on the basis of sex or gender
identity or expression for any purpose under state or local law.
2. A governmental entity, a licensing or accrediting
organization or any athletic association or organization shall not
entertain a complaint, open an investigation or take any other
adverse action against an institution for maintaining separate
interscholastic or intramural athletic teams or sports for students
of the female sex or the male sex.
Sec. 12. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of NRS 41.0305
to 41.039, inclusive, but subject to the limitation on damages set
forth in NRS 41.035, when applicable:
(a) A student who is deprived of an athletic opportunity or
suffers any direct or indirect harm as a result of an institution
knowingly violating sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of this act may
bring an action against the institution for injunctive relief,
damages and any other relief available under law.
(b) A student who is subject to retaliation or other adverse
action by an institution or athletic association or organization as a
result of reporting a violation of sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of this
act to an employee or representative of the institution or athletic
association or organization or to any state or federal agency with
oversight of institutions in this State may bring an action against
the institution or athletic association or organization for injunctive
relief, damages and any other relief available under law.
(c) An institution that suffers any direct or indirect harm as a
result of a violation of sections 9 to 12, inclusive, of this act by a
governmental entity, licensing or accrediting organization or
athletic association or organization may bring an action for
injunctive relief, damages and any other relief available under
law.
2. A civil action brought pursuant to subsection 1 must be
initiated within 2 years after the harm occurred. A person or
organization who prevails on a claim brought pursuant to this
-
*AB240*

– 8 –
section is entitled to monetary damages, including, without
limitation, for any psychological, emotional and physical harm
suffered, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and any other
appropriate relief.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB240*